src/fst/stems/adjective.lexc
LEXICON Adjectives
   senere Adjective_Reg ; !sinewey
   trolig Adjective_Reg ; !likely, probable
   mange: Adjective_Mange ; !many
   brukt Adjective_Brukt ; !used
   tidligere Adjective_Reg ; !former
   st:or Adjective_stor ; !large, big, great
   moderne Adjective_Reg ; !modern
   kongelig Adjective_Brukt ; !royal
   gift Adjective_Brukt ; !married
   første Adjective_Reg ; !first

LEXICON Adjective_Reg
    +Adj: # ;

LEXICON Adjective_Mange
   +Adj+Com:fler # ;
   +Adj+Com:flere # ;
   +Adj+Ind+Sup:flest # ;
   +Adj+Def+Sup:fleste # ;

LEXICON Adjective_Brukt
   +Adj+Neu+Sg: # ;
   +Adj+Neu+Sg+Def:e # ;
   +Adj+Neu+Pl+Def:e # ;

LEXICON Adjective_stor
   +Adj:or # ;
   +Adj+Neu+Sg:ort # ;
   +Adj+Neu+Sg+Def:ore # ;
   +Adj+Neu+Pl+Def:ore # ;
   +Adj+Neu+Com:ørre # ;
   +Adj+Neu+Ind+Sup:ørst # ;
   +Adj+Neu+Def+Sup:ørste # ;
